Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 1. General Provisions
(Wyo. 1976); Grams v. Environmental Quality Council, 730 P.2d 784,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 649

(Wyo. 1986).

Quoted

in

Nickelson v. People, 607 P.2d 904,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 239

(Wyo. 1980); Rocky Mt. Oil & Gas Ass'n v. State, 645 P.2d 1163,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 345

(Wyo. 1982); People v. Platte Pipe Line Company, 649 P.2d 208,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 368

(Wyo. 1982); LeFaivre v. Environmental Quality Council, 735 P.2d 428,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 421

(Wyo. 1987).

Cited

in

Belle Fourche Pipeline Co. v. Elmore Livestock Co., 669 P.2d 505,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 357

(Wyo. 1983); Compass Ins. Co. v. Cravens, Dargan & Co., 748 P.2d 724,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1988).

Law reviews. —

For case note, “Environmental Law — Strict Liability for Oil Spills in Wyoming. People v. Platte Pipe Line Company, 649 P.2d 208,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 368

(Wyo. 1982),” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 805 (1983).

For comment, “Hazardous Waste Cleanup in Wyoming: Legal Tools Available to the Private Citizen,” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 395 (1984).

For comment, “State Participation in Federal Policy Making for the Yellowstone Ecosystem: A Meaningful Solution or Business as Usual?” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 397 (1986).

Library references. —

18 Nat. Resources & Env't Law Review 24.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Recovery in trespass for injury to land caused by airborne pollutants, 2 ALR4th 1054.

What constitutes “discharge of dredged or fill material” into navigable waters, so as to be subject to permit requirements under § 404(a) of Federal Water Pollution Control Act (33 USC § 1344(a)), 72 ALR Fed 703.

Establishing “release or threatened release” of hazardous substance from facility for purposes of liability pursuant to § 107 of Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act (42 USCS § 9607), 120 ALR Fed 1.

What are “navigable waters” subject to Federal Water Pollution Control Act (33 U.S.C. §§ 1251 et seq.), 160 ALR Fed 585.